Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 2
GENERAL ADMINISTRATIVE POWERS

31-15-201. Administrative powers.

The governing bodies in municipalities shall have the following general powers in relation to the administration of the municipality's affairs:

To fill, by appointment, any vacancy occurring by death, removal, or resignation of any member of the governing body. Such appointee shall receive a majority vote of the remaining members of the governing body and shall hold his office only until the next regular election when the vacancy shall be filled by election as in other cases.

To provide by ordinance for the appointment, term of office, removal, powers, duties, and compensation of all officers not otherwise provided for and of all employees;

To appoint a board of health and prescribe its powers and duties;

To provide for the taking of the municipal census, but no such census shall be taken by authority of the governing body more often than once between the years prescribed by law for the United States census to be taken;

To provide by ordinance that all the paper, printing, stationery, blanks, fuel, and all the supplies needed for the use of the municipality shall be furnished by contract let to the lowest bidder;

To organize, own, operate, control, direct, manage, contract for, or furnish ambulance service;

To provide for the management and operation of any municipally owned hospital by any entity, public or private, profit or nonprofit, which the municipality determines will provide adequate and efficient administration for the operation of such hospital and to enter into contracts relating to such municipally owned hospital as authorized by part 1 of article 3 of title 25.5, C.R.S.;

To authorize the use of electronic records or signatures and adopt rules, standards, policies, and procedures for use of electronic records or signatures pursuant to article 71.3 of title 24, C.R.S.;

To establish an affordable housing dwelling unit advisory board for the municipality in accordance with the requirements of article 26 of title 29, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1105, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(1)(f) added, p. 1285, § 4, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 79:

(1)(g) added, p. 836, § 5, effective June 21.

L. 83:

(1)(g) amended, p. 1146, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1)(g) amended, p. 1005, § 9, effective October 1.

L. 91:

(1)(g) amended, p. 588, § 12, effective October 1.

L. 99:

(1)(h) added, p. 1348, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(i) added, p. 977, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2002:

(1)(h) amended, p. 858, § 8, effective May 30.

L. 2006:

(1)(g) amended, p. 2022, § 115, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.